Colorado, session 2026A, HB1152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of early
childhood for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part III as
follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART III
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) General Administration
Personal Services 8,320,096
(77.8 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 4,321,929
4,013,539
Short-term Disability 17,153
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 110,267
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 2,450,376
Salary Survey 673,166
Step Pay 103,887
PERA Direct Distribution 434,604
Shift Differential 81
Workers' Compensation 66,300
Operating Expenses 846,987
Legal Services 1,431,001
Administrative Law Judge
Services 2,822
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 4,303
Vehicle Lease Payments 8,026
6,910
Capital Outlay 126,730
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Leased Space 332,520
Statewide Indirect Cost
Assessment 176,389
19,426,637 8,020,520 1,832,654a 8,045,430b 1,528,033c
19,117,131 7,799,193 1,784,617a 8,040,248b 1,493,073c
a Of this amount, $357,209 $349,000 shall be from the Preschool Programs Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-4-209 (1)(a), C.R.S., $180,280 $175,598 shall be from the Nurse Home
Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $97,401(I) shall be from the Early Intervention Services Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S.,
$61,362 $59,915 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $1,136,402 $1,102,703 shall be from various cash fund sources. The Early
Intervention Services Trust Fund amount is shown for informational purposes only as this fund is not subject to appropriation by the General Assembly and the amount is exempt from
the restrictions on state spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution pursuant to Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $176,389 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries, $7,869,041 $7,863,859 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess
Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $1,527,695 $1,492,735 shall be from Child Care Development Funds and $338 reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Part C of the federal Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act.
(B) Information Technology Systems
Information Technology
Contracts and Equipment 11,792,150 7,852,664 3,260,000a 679,486b
Information Technology
Systems Managed by Other
Departments 571,796 66,622 505,174b
Payments to OIT 14,906,899 12,285,052 2,621,847c
14,751,986 12,157,388 2,594,598c
CORE Operations 21,441 21,441
Child Care Automated
Tracking System 4,414,382 504,449 3,909,933b
31,706,668
31,551,755
a This amount shall be from the Preschool Program Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-4-209 (1)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b These amounts shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
c Of this amount, $2,212,137 $2,189,146 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
and $409,710 $405,452 shall be from transfers from the Department of State.
51,133,305
50,668,886
(2) PARTNERSHIPS AND COLLABORATIONS9
Personal Services 852,058 286,380 565,678a
(6.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 182,766 45,846 136,920a
Local Coordinating
Organizations 4,521,570 4,521,570b
Early Childhood Councils 4,414,452 1,000,000 3,414,452a
Child Care Resource and
Referrals 663,835 663,835a
633,835 633,835a
Family Resource Centers 1,545,654 1,545,654
Indirect Cost Assessment 386,287 386,287a
12,566,622
12,536,622
a These amounts shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
b This amount shall be from the Preschool Program Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-4-209 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(3) EARLY LEARNING ACCESS AND QUALITY9
Personal Services 8,855,201 3,044,800 993,476a 4,816,925b
(61.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 245,326 19,022 18,430a 207,874b
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Universal Preschool Program 349,096,944 146,333,200 202,763,744a
359,096,944 212,763,744a
Child Care Assistance
Program 185,700,444 37,058,921 20,296,012(I)c 128,345,511d
Intrastate Child Care
Assistance Program
Redistribution 500,000 500,000b
Workforce Recruitment and
Retention Grants 1,128,167 1,128,167b
978,167 978,167b
Professional Development
and Training 2,425,317 75,000 2,350,317b
2,345,317 2,270,317b
Early Childhood Quality and
Availability 10,490,649 3,043,243 7,447,406b
10,240,649 7,197,406b
Imagination Library of
Colorado 1,624,365 1,624,365
Indirect Cost Assessment 4,931,423 4,931,423b
564,997,836
574,517,836
a These amounts shall be from the Preschool Programs Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-4-209 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
c This amount shall be from local funds and reflects the local share of the costs of administering the Child Care Assistance Program and the local share of child care subsidies. The (L)
notation and the (I) notation apply to this amount.
d Of this amount, $128,245,511shall be from Child Care Development Funds and $100,000 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) COMMUNITY AND FAMILY SUPPORT9
Personal Services 4,389,273 2,041,221 489,586a 1,858,466b
(23.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 329,641 185,233 52,188c 92,220d
Early Intervention 99,946,707 76,986,834 10,987,177(I)e 5,940,111f 6,032,585(I)g
92,604,480 69,644,607
Home Visiting 29,791,933 628,226 27,400,370h 1,763,337(I)i
Child Maltreatment
Prevention 14,697,067 8,350,453 2,208,216j 4,138,398(I)k
Early Childhood Mental
Health Services 3,689,262 1,627,813 2,061,449l
Social-Emotional Learning
Programs Grants 817,289 817,289m
Child Care Services and
Substance Use Disorder
Treatment Pilot Program 500,000 500,000
Universal Home Visiting
Pilot Program 2,528,842 2,528,842
(1.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,000,976 308,754n 692,222o
157,690,990
150,348,763
a Of this amount, $243,219 shall be from the Nurse Home Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $126,043 shall be from the Colorado Child Abuse
Prevention Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-206 (1), C.R.S., $110,154 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $10,170(I) shall
be from the Early Intervention Services Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S. The Early Intervention Services Trust Fund amount is shown for informational purposes
only as this fund is not subject to appropriation by the General Assembly and the amount is exempt from the restrictions on state spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the
State Constitution pursuant to Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,515,563(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, $182,256 shall be from Child Care
Development Funds, $95,779(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Title IV-B, Subpart 2, of the Social Security Act, and $64,868(I) reflects funds anticipated to be
received pursuant to the Community-based Child Abuse Prevention Grant fund.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c Of this amount, $29,084 shall be from the Nurse Home Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $20,254 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $2,850 shall be from the Colorado Child Abuse Prevention Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-206 (1), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $33,202 shall be from Child Care Development Funds, $32,944(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, $21,024(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Title IV-B, Subpart 2, of the Social Security Act, and $5,050(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received
pursuant to the Community-based Child Abuse Prevention Grant fund.
e This amount shall be from the Early Intervention Services Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S. The Early Intervention Services Trust Fund amount is shown for
informational purposes only as this fund is not subject to appropriation by the General Assembly and the amount is exempt from the restrictions on state spending imposed by Section
20 of Article X of the State Constitution pursuant to Section 26.5-3-409 (2)(a), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing.
g This amount reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
h This amount shall be from the Nurse Home Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., which is received as a damage award and, as such, does not constitute
fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
i This amount shall be from the Maternal, Infant and Early Childhood Home Visiting Grant program.
j Of this amount, $1,074,400(I)(L) shall be from local funds and $1,133,816 shall be from the Colorado Child Abuse Prevention Trust Fund created in Section 26.5-3-206 (1), C.R.S.
k Of this amount, $3,390,000(I) reflects funds anticipated to be received pursuant to Title IV-B, Subpart 2, of the Social Security Act, and $748,398(I) reflects funds anticipated to be
received pursuant to the Community-based Child Abuse Prevention Grant fund.
l This amount shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
m This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
n Of this amount, $204,077 shall be from the Nurse Home Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., and $104,677 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
The Nurse Home Visitor Program Fund created in Section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., is received as a damage award and, as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the
purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
o Of this amount, $237,687 shall be from Child Care Development Funds and $454,535(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
(5) LICENSING AND ADMINISTRATION9
Personal Services 10,798,873 2,850,540 1,283,751a 6,664,582b
(64.3 FTE)
Operating Expenses 505,950 49,366 271,615c 184,969d
Background Investigation
Unit 1,261,344 1,261,344e
(8.7 FTE)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 3,936,660 317,720f 3,618,940b
16,502,827
a Of this amount, $1,273,751 shall be from the Child Care Licensing Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-5-311 (4), C.R.S. and $10,000(I) shall be from the Child Care Cash Fund created
in Section 26.5-5-323 (4), C.R.S. The Child Care Cash Fund amount is shown for informational purposes as it is continuously appropriated for activities related to the improvement of
the quality of child care in Colorado, pursuant to Section 26.5-5-323 (4), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
c This amount shall be from the Child Care Licensing Cash Fund created in Section 26.5-5-311 (4), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $150,000(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, and $34,969 shall be from Child Care Development Funds. The amount from Title IV-E of the Social
Security Act is reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in determining the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements
Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
e Of this amount, $970,811 shall be from the Records and Reports Fund created in Section 19-1-307 (2.5)(b), C.R.S. and $290,533 shall be from the Child Care Licensing Cash Fund
created in Section 26.5-5-311 (4), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
TOTALS PART III
(EARLY CHILDHOOD) $802,891,580 $318,575,707 $279,083,896a $16,607,388 $188,624,589b
$804,574,934 $310,884,489 $289,035,859a $16,574,957 $188,079,629b
a Of this amount, $32,475,160 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
b Of this amount, $14,274,421 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
9 Department of Early Childhood, Partnerships and Collaboration; Early Learning Access and Quality; Community and Family Support; Licensing and
Administration -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department of Early Childhood may transfer up to 5.0 percent
of the total amount appropriated to the indirect cost assessment line items in these divisions among the indirect cost assessment line items in these divisions.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1152

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1152